Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.130

Transfer of powers, duties, assets, etc., to the Washington grain commission.

(1) The Washington grain commission is the successor in interest to the Washington wheat commission and the Washington barley commission and is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and other such powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

(2) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley commission must be delivered to the custody of the Washington grain commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property owned or employed by the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley commission must be delivered to the Washington grain commission. The Washington grain commission shall ensure the timely transfers of all legal titles, registrations, and licenses made necessary by this subsection. All funds, accounts, investments, credits, or other assets held by the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley commission must be transferred or assigned to the Washington grain commission. All debts, liabilities, and obligations owed by the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley commission must be transferred or assigned to the Washington grain commission.

(3) All employees of the Washington wheat commission or Washington barley commission are transferred to the Washington grain commission.

(4) Beginning with the final initial appointment made under RCW 15.115.050, the interim commissioners shall submit timely reports to the director summarizing the progress made in completing the actions required under this section and any other actions necessary to complete the transition provided for in this chapter.

(5) When the interim commissioners have completed the actions required under this section and any other actions necessary to complete the transition provided for in this chapter, they shall so certify in writing to the director. The Washington wheat commission and Washington barley commission cease to exist as of the date that certification is received by the director. Once the director has received the certification, the director is authorized and shall take action to repeal the marketing orders addressing wheat or barley.

(6) All actions required under this section must be completed by the interim commissioners no later than one hundred twenty days after the final initial appointment is made under RCW 15.115.050.

(7) RCW 15.66.157 and 15.66.160 do not apply to the Washington wheat commission and the Washington barley commission.

[ 2009 c 33 s 13.]